Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.320

Penalty for falsification.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement or falsifies or permits to be falsified any record or records of the Washington state patrol retirement fund in any attempt to defraud such fund shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.43.320. Prior: 1947 c 250 s 21; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 6362-101.]